Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOFTWARE MODERNIZATION AND OUTREACH; CHARITIES REVIEW COUNCIL.new text end new text begin $220,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for the Charities Review Council to update the council's proprietary, cloud-based software used both internally and externally to deliver the council's full accrediting process to nonprofit partners across the state, as well as to support the expansion of the council's statewide outreach to organizations in need of accountability services. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end